nouns.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+NM +NF +Sg +Pl +Nom +Gen +Dat +Acc +Ins +Loc +Voc

! Lexicon containing lexical stems
LEXICON Root
    vyr NM ; ! man/husband
    berniuk NM ; ! boy
    žmon NF ; ! wife
    mergin NF ; ! girl
    book NF ; ! book
    dien NF ; ! day
    vakar NM ; ! evening
    ryt NM ; ! morning
    maist NM ; ! food
    biblij NF ; ! Bible

! Lexicon containing POS tag for masculine
LEXICON NM
+NM: NM-suff ;

! Lexicon containing POS tag for feminine
LEXICON NF
+NF: NF-suff ;

! Lexicon containing inflectional suffixes for masculine nouns
LEXICON NM-suff
+Sg+Nom:as # ;
+Sg+Gen:o # ;
+Sg+Dat:ui # ;
+Sg+Acc:ą # ;
+Sg+Ins:u # ;
+Sg+Loc:e # ;
+Sg+Voc:e # ;
+Pl+Nom:ai # ;
+Pl+Gen:ų # ;
+Pl+Dat:ams # ;
+Pl+Acc:us # ;
+Pl+Ins:ais # ;
+Pl+Loc:uose # ;
+Pl+Voc:ai # ;

! Lexicon containing inflectional suffixes for feminine nouns
LEXICON NF-suff
+Sg+Nom:a # ;
+Sg+Gen:os # ;
+Sg+Dat:ai # ;
+Sg+Acc:ą # ;
+Sg+Ins:a # ;
+Sg+Loc:oje # ;
+Sg+Voc:a # ;
+Pl+Nom:os # ;
+Pl+Gen:ų # ;
+Pl+Dat:oms # ;
+Pl+Acc:as # ;
+Pl+Ins:omis # ;
+Pl+Loc:ose # ;
+Pl+Voc:os # ;
